Utah statutes.
76-8-504.5.   False statements -- Preliminary hearing.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the person makes a false statement:

(a)  which the person does not believe to be true;

(b)  that the person has reason to believe will be used in a preliminary hearing; and

(c)  after having been notified either verbally or in writing that:

(i)  the statement may be used in a preliminary hearing before a magistrate or a judge; and

(ii)  if the person makes a false statement after having received this notification, he is subject to a criminal penalty.

(2)  Notification under Subsection (1) is sufficient if it is verbal or written and is in substantially the following form: "You are notified that statements you are about to make may be presented to a magistrate or a judge in lieu of your sworn testimony at a preliminary examination.  Any false statement you make and that you do not believe to be true may subject you to criminal punishment as a class A misdemeanor."

